Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 2

Marginal Release of Liens

66-25-201. Marginal release authorized.

The release on satisfaction of any debt, contract or obligation, secured by mortgage or deed of trust, liens retained upon the face of any deed or conveyance, or any other lien, evidenced by written instrument, probated and registered according to law, and the discharge of any such mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien, may be acknowledged by the payee, creditor, obligee, or holder of such debt, contract, or obligation, or by such person's true and lawful assignee, or by the personal representative of such holder, or the assignee of such representative, by an entry, subscribed in the presence of the register of the county where any such instrument is lawfully registered, on the margin of the record thereof, or by execution in like manner of a statement of release in substantially the form prescribed in §66-25-202 that may be recorded as a written release to allow for effecting the equivalent of a marginal release where microfilming or photocopy or other permanent recording processes are used, and where so done, the statement of release shall be filed and recorded by the register; provided, that the register is personally acquainted with such holder or person making such release, and shall subscribe the same as a witness, in authentication thereof, which the register's official signature shall conclusively imply. Any such entry, when made in accordance with §§66-25-201 —66-25-203, shall have the same effect as a deed of release or quitclaim, duly executed by the person making the release, authenticated and registered.

Acts 1990, ch. 902, § 6.

66-25-202. Form of marginal release.

The release may be in substantially the following form:

I (or we), , declare that I am (or we are) the true and lawful holder (or holders) of the claim (or part of the claim, and specifying what part) secured by the instrument within recorded, and hereby acknowledge the satisfaction thereof and discharge of the lien to secure the same in full (or if one (1) part, or partial amount, state what part). This day of A.D. Attest as to A.B.; C.D., Register.

Acts 1990, ch. 902, § 7.

66-25-203. Execution of marginal release — Fee.

The entry, except the signature of the person making the release and the attesting signature of the register or the register's deputy, shall be either in the handwriting of the register or the register's deputy or by stamp or both; provided, that the register may charge and collect for the register's services in making the entry, and officially authenticating the same, the sum of three dollars ($3.00).

Acts 1990, ch. 902, § 8.

66-25-204. Marginal release as part of record — Certified copies.

Such marginal entry shall, from the time it is made, constitute a part of the record pertaining to such instrument, and shall constitute a part of any transcript of the same thereafter made and certified. Any person having lawful custody of the original instrument, with its certificate of registration, or of a certified transcript made before the release was recorded, may apply to the register who shall on payment of a fee of one dollar ($1.00) certify a true copy thereof upon the original instrument or certified copy previously made.

The release, duly certified in any of the methods mentioned in this section, shall be received in evidence in any court in any matter or litigation wherein the same may be material.

Acts 1990, ch. 902, § 9.

66-25-205. Production of instrument evidencing indebtedness before entry of marginal release.

Any person appearing before the register for the purpose of making a release or partial release of any lien, on the margin opposite any such instrument of record in any book in the registry, shall produce and exhibit to the register, at the time of applying for such release, the original note or other instrument evidencing the indebtedness secured by the lien, or file an affidavit excusing the production thereof upon the ground that same has been lost, destroyed or mislaid, unintentionally.

Acts 1990, ch. 902, § 10.

66-25-206. Endorsement as to marginal release on face of instrument.

It is the duty of the register, or the register's deputy, in case such original instrument is produced, to write or stamp, or both, across its face, and to sign officially, a certificate, properly dated, showing that the same has been released, wholly or partially, as the case may be, and specifying the book and page where the release appears.

The certificate may be, substantially, in the following form:

The lien securing this instrument was duly released (in whole or in part, specifying the extent), as appears of record in Deed Book (or Trust Book) , page , in the office of the undersigned.

This day of , 20 .

County Register

Acts 1990, ch. 902, § 11.

Cross-References. Entry of release of lien, fee, §66-21-121.

66-25-207. Affidavit in lieu of production of instrument.

In case the lawful owner or holder of the instrument secured, as provided in this part, shall be unable to produce same at the time of making application for such release, on account of same having been lost, destroyed or mislaid, the lawful owner or holder of the instrument secured shall subscribe and swear to an affidavit, before the register or deputy, hereby duly authorized to administer such oaths, stating that such person is the true and lawful owner or holder of the instrument thereby secured, and stating briefly the facts which account for the inability of the owner or holder to produce such instrument.

The affidavit, excusing production, shall be substantially in the following form:

State of Tennessee

County of

I, , do hereby solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am the true and lawful owner or holder of the note (or other instrument) secured by a lien created by an instrument which is of record in Deed (or Trust) Book , page , of the register's office of County, Tennessee; that I desire to make a marginal release of the lien securing the instrument (in whole or in part, as the case may be — specifying the extent); that the same has been fully paid (wholly or in part, as the case may be — specifying the extent) to me as such lawful owner and holder, and that I am unable to produce the original note (or other instrument) for the following reasons: (Here state briefly the facts showing why the secured instrument cannot be produced for cancellation, and that its loss, etc., was unintentional).

Owner or Holder of Note

Sworn to and subscribed before me, this the day of , 20 .

Register or Deputy

Any person who shall willfully swear falsely in the affidavit is guilty of perjury, and liable to the penalty for perjury upon conviction.

The affidavit shall be filed with the register, and shall be recorded by the register in a well-bound book to be kept by the register in the register's office, and the original affidavit shall be filed and preserved as a record of the register's office.

In case the affidavit is made, the register shall charge a fee of one dollar ($1.00) for filing and recording the same, in addition to the register's fee for attesting the marginal release, these fees to be paid by the party making the release.

Upon the making of the affidavit, the register or the register's deputy shall permit a party to make the marginal release upon the record, where the original secured instrument is not produced, this release to be duly attested by the register or the register's deputy.

Acts 1990, ch. 902, § 12.

Cross-References. Perjury, §39-16-702.

66-25-208. Procurement of release by forgery or fabrication — Penalties.

Any person who produces a fabricated or forged note or other evidence of indebtedness secured by a lien, and procures thereby a release under §§ 66-25-201 — 66-25-206, is guilty of forgery and punishable accordingly.

If the true note, or other such evidence of indebtedness be produced, after its fraudulent or felonious obtainment, and the lien thereby procured to be so released, such person is guilty of a felony, with penalty as in case of forgery.

Acts 1990, ch. 902, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. The felony provisions in this section may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§39-11-113,40-35-110,40-35-111.

Cross-References. Forgery, §39-14-114.

66-25-209. Liability of register for improper release.

Should the register attest a marginal release without seeing to the compliance with the requirements of this chapter, the register and the sureties on the register's official bond shall be liable to any person injured in consequence thereof.

Acts 1990, ch. 902, § 14.

66-25-210. Right to release by deed of release or quitclaim preserved.

This chapter shall not be construed to preclude the right of release by way of deed of release or quitclaim.

Acts 1990, ch. 902, § 15.

66-25-211. Applicability of this part to certain counties.

This part applies to any county having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand six hundred (32,600) nor more than thirty-two thousand seven hundred (32,700), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1990, ch. 902, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.